trunk/apertium-eu-es/apertium-eu-es.eu-es-adjgender.dix
    <pardef n="VA_ADI_SIN">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VAG0000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VAIC1P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VAIC1S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VAIC2P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VAIC2S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VAIC3P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VAIC3S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VAIF1P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VAIF1S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VAIF2P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VAIF2S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VAIF3P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VAIF3S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VAII1P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VAII1S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VAII2P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VAII2S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VAII3P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VAII3S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VAIP1P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VAIP1S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VAIP2P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VAIP2S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VAIP3P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VAIP3S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VAIS1P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VAIS1S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VAIS2P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VAIS2S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VAIS3P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VAIS3S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VAM01P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VAM02P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VAM02S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VAM03P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VAM03S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VAN0000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VAP0000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]<s n="suf"/>+[AMM][PART]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VAP00PF</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]<s n="suf"/>+[AMM][PART]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VAP00PM</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]<s n="suf"/>+[AMM][PART]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VAP00SF</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]<s n="suf"/>+[AMM][PART]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VAP00SM</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]<s n="suf"/>+[AMM][PART]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VASF1P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VASF1S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VASF2P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VASF2S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VASF3P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VASF3S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VASI1P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VASI1S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VASI2P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VASI2S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VASI3P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VASI3S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VASP1P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VASP1S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VASP2P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VASP2S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VASP3P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VASP3S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>egon</l> 
        <r>haber</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="VA_ADI_SIN"/> 
    </e>
